test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-norm.yaml
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: makizinenhimiwaaiban
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: makizinenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: makizinenhiminiiban
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: makizinenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: makizinensiminaanan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: makizinensiminaanag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: makizinensiminaaning
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: makizinensimiwaaan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: makizinensimiwaaag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: makizinensimiwaaing
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: makizinensiminian
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: makizinensiminiag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: makizinensiminiing
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: makizinenhiminaanan
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: makizinenhiminaanag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: makizinenhiminaaning
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: makizinenhimiwaaan
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: makizinenhimiwaaag
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: makizinenhimiwaaing
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: makizinenhiminian
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: makizinenhiminiag
     makizin+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: makizinenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: makizinensimibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: makizinensimibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: makizinensimibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: makizinensim***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: makizinensim***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: makizinensim***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: makizinenhimibanan
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: makizinenhimibanag
     makizin+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: makizinenhimibaning
     makizin+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhim***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhim***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makizinensishinaaniban
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makizinensishinaan***idig, idog***
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makizinensishiwaaiban
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makizinensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makizinensishiniiban
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makizinensishini***idig, idog***
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makizinenhishinaaniban
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makizinenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makizinenhishiwaaiban
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makizinenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makizinenhishiniiban
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makizinenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makizinensishinaanan
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makizinensishinaanag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makizinensishinaaning
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makizinensishiwaaan
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makizinensishiwaaag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makizinensishiwaaing
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makizinensishinian
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makizinensishiniag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makizinensishiniing
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makizinenhishinaanan
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makizinenhishinaanag
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makizinenhishinaaning
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makizinenhishiwaaan
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makizinenhishiwaaag
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makizinenhishiwaaing
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makizinenhishinian
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makizinenhishiniag
     makizin+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makizinenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: makizinensishibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: makizinensishibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: makizinensishibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makizinensish***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makizinensish***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makizinensish***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: makizinenhishibanan
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: makizinenhishibanag
     makizin+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: makizinenhishibaning
     makizin+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhish***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhish***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makizinensinaanibanan
     makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makizinensinaanibanag
     makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makizinensinaanibaning
     makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makizinensinaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makizinensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makizinensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinensiwaaibanan
     makizin+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinensiwaaibanag
     makizin+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinensiwaaibaning
     makizin+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makizinensiniibanan
     makizin+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makizinensiniibanag
     makizin+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makizinensiniibaning
     makizin+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinensini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinensini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinensini***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makizinenhinaanibanan
     makizin+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makizinenhinaanibanag
     makizin+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makizinenhinaanibaning
     makizin+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinenhiwaaibanan
     makizin+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinenhiwaaibanag
     makizin+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinenhiwaaibaning
     makizin+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makizinenhiniibanan
     makizin+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makizinenhiniibanag
     makizin+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makizinenhiniibaning
     makizin+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinenhini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinenhini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: makizinimishinaaniban
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: makizinimishinaan***idig, idog***
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: makizinimishiwaaiban
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: makizinimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: makizinimishiniiban
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: makizinimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: makizinimishinaanan
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: makizinimishinaanag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: makizinimishinaaning
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: makizinimishiwaaan
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: makizinimishiwaaag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: makizinimishiwaaing
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: makizinimishinian
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: makizinimishiniag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: makizinimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: makizinimishibanan
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: makizinimishibanag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: makizinimishibaning
     makizin+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: makizinimish***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: makizinimish***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: makizinimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makiziniminaanibanan
     makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makiziniminaanibanag
     makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makiziniminaanibaning
     makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makiziniminaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makiziniminaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makiziniminaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinimiwaaibanan
     makizin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinimiwaaibanag
     makizin+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinimiwaaibaning
     makizin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makiziniminiibanan
     makizin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makiziniminiibanag
     makizin+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makiziniminiibaning
     makizin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinimini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinimini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: makizinishinaanibanan
     makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: makizinishinaanibanag
     makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: makizinishinaanibaning
     makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: makizinishinaan***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: makizinishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: makizinishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: makizinishiwaaibanan
     makizin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: makizinishiwaaibanag
     makizin+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: makizinishiwaaibaning
     makizin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: makizinishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: makizinishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: makizinishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     makizin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: makizinishiniibanan
     makizin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: makizinishiniibanag
     makizin+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: makizinishiniibaning
     makizin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: makizinishini***idig, idog***an
     makizin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: makizinishini***idig, idog***ag
     makizin+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: makizinishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimakizinensimishinaan
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nimakizinensimishiwaa
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nimakizinensimishini
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimakizinenhimishinaan
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nimakizinenhimishiwaa
     +Px1makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nimakizinenhimishini
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimakizinensimishinaan
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gimakizinensimishiwaa
     +Px2makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gimakizinensimishini
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimakizinenhimishinaan
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gimakizinenhimishiwaa
     +Px2makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gimakizinenhimishini
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: omakizinensimishinaan
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: omakizinensimishiwaa
     +Px3makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: omakizinensimishini
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: omakizinenhimishinaan
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: omakizinenhimishiwaa
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: omakizinenhimishini
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: imakizinensimishinaan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: imakizinensimishiwaa
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: imakizinensimishini
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: imakizinenhimishinaan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: imakizinenhimishiwaa
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: imakizinenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1makizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimakizinensimishiban
